ru: Функции pad-контроллера для исполнения: Назначаемые пэды; Канальное послекасание; Режим аккордов; Режим mute/solo; Повтор/дробь нот (функция повтора); Банки пэдов (несколько слоев); Кривые отклика пэдов; Регулируемая чувствительность пэдов; Полифоническое послекасание; Пэды, чувствительные к давлению (без послекасания); RGB/подсветка пэдов (светящиеся); Функции Roll/Flam; Режим звукоряда; Пошаговый секвенсор; Сенсорная полоса; Управление воспроизведением; Чувствительные к силе нажатия пэды; Дисплей визуальной обратной связи; Сенсорная панель X/Y; Другое
fr: Fonctions de jeu des pads du contrôleur: Pads assignables; Aftertouch de canal; Mode accord; Mode mute/solo; Répétition de note/roulement (fonction de répétition); Banques de pads (couches multiples); Courbes de réponse des pads; Sensibilité des pads réglable; Aftertouch polyphonique; Pads sensibles à la pression (sans aftertouch); Pads RVB/rétroéclairés (lumineux); Fonctions roulement/flam; Mode gamme; Séquenceur pas à pas; Bande tactile; Commandes de transport; Pads sensibles à la vélocité; Écran de retour visuel; Pavé tactile X/Y; Autre
ko: 패드 컨트롤러 연주 기능: 지정 가능 패드; 채널 애프터터치; 코드 모드; 음소거/솔로 모드; 노트 리피트/롤(반복 기능); 패드 뱅크(다중 레이어); 패드 응답 곡선; 패드 감도 조절 가능; 폴리포닉 애프터터치; 압력 감지 패드(애프터터치 없음); RGB/백라이트 패드(조명 켜짐); 롤/플램 기능; 스케일 모드; 스텝 시퀀서; 터치 스트립; 트랜스포트 컨트롤; 벨로시티 감지 패드; 시각적 피드백 디스플레이; X/Y 터치 패드; 기타
th: แพดผู้ควบคุมคุณสมบัติประสิทธิภาพ: แพดแบบกำหนดได้; อาฟเตอร์ทัชของแชนแนล; โหมดคอร์ด; โหมดปิดเสียง/โซโล; เล่นโน้ตซ้ำ/รัว (ฟังก์ชันเล่นซ้ำ); แบงก์แพด (หลายเลเยอร์); กราฟการตอบสนองของแพด; ปรับความไวของแพดได้; อาฟเตอร์ทัชแบบโพลีโฟนิก; แพดไวต่อแรงกด (ไม่มีอาฟเตอร์ทัช); แพด RGB/มีไฟแบ็คไลท์ (เรืองแสง); ฟังก์ชัน Roll/Flam; โหมดสเกล; ซีเควนเซอร์แบบสเต็ป; แถบสัมผัส; ปุ่มควบคุมการเล่น; แพดตอบสนองต่อน้ำหนักการกด; จอแสดงผลด้วยภาพ; ทัชแพด X/Y; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Характеристики на производителността на контролерните подложки: Програмируеми падове; Канален aftertouch; Режим на акорди; Режим заглушаване/соло; Повторение на нота/рол (функция за повторение); Банки за падове (множество слоеве); Криви на реакция на падовете; Регулируема чувствителност на падовете; Полифоничен aftertouch; Чувствителни на натиск падове (без aftertouch); RGB/подсветка на падове (осветени); Функции рол/флам; Режим на гами; Стъпков секвенсър; Сензорна лента; Бутони за управление на възпроизвеждането; Чувствителни на скорост на натиск падове; Дисплей за визуална обратна връзка; X/Y сензорен пад; Друго
vi: Các tính năng hiệu suất của bộ điều khiển Pad: Mặt gõ có thể gán phím; Channel aftertouch; Chế độ hợp âm; Chế độ tắt tiếng/độc tấu; Lặp lại/cuộn nốt (chức năng lặp lại); Nhóm mặt gõ (nhiều lớp); Đường cong phản hồi mặt gõ; Độ nhạy mặt gõ có thể điều chỉnh; Polyphonic aftertouch; Mặt gõ cảm ứng lực (không có aftertouch); Mặt gõ RGB/có đèn nền (chiếu sáng); Chức năng Roll/Flam; Chế độ âm giai; Bộ thu tuần tự; Dải cảm ứng; Phím điều khiển phát nhạc; Mặt gõ cảm ứng tốc độ; Màn hình phản hồi trực quan; Màn hình cảm ứng X/Y; Khác
sv: Prestandafunktioner för pad-kontroller: Tilldelningsbara pads; Kanal-aftertouch; Ackordsläge; Mute/solo-läge; Note repeat/roll (upprepningsfunktion); Padbanker (flera lager); Pads-responskurvor; Justerbar känslighet för pads; Polyfonisk aftertouch; Tryckkänsliga pads (ingen aftertouch); RGB/bakgrundsbelysta pads (upplysta); Roll/flam-funktioner; Skalläge; Stegsekvenserare; Touch-remsa; Transportkontroller; Anslagskänsliga pads; Display för visuell feedback; X/Y-pekplatta; Övrigt
cs: Výkonové funkce Pad kontroleru: Přiřaditelné pady; Kanálový aftertouch; Režim akordů; Režim Mute/Solo; Opakování noty / víření (funkce opakování); Banky padů (více vrstev); Křivky odezvy padů; Nastavitelná citlivost padů; Polyfonní aftertouch; Tlakově citlivé pady (bez aftertouch); RGB / podsvícené pady (osvětlené); Funkce Roll/Flam; Režim stupnic; Krokový sekvencér; Dotykový pásek; Transportní ovládání; Pady citlivé na rychlost úhozu; Displej s vizuální zpětnou vazbou; Dotykový X/Y pad; Ostatní
en: Pad controller performance features: Assignable pads; Channel aftertouch; Chord mode; Mute/solo mode; Note repeat/roll (repeat function); Pad banks (multiple layers); Pad response curves; Pad sensitivity adjustable; Polyphonic aftertouch; Pressure-sensitive pads (no aftertouch); RGB/backlit pads (illuminated); Roll/Flam functions; Scale mode; Step sequencer; Touch strip; Transport controls; Velocity-sensitive pads; Visual feedback display; X/Y touch pad; Other
ro-RO: Caracteristici de performanță ale pad controllerului: Pad-uri asignabile; Channel aftertouch; Mod acord; Mod mute/solo; Repetare/Rulare notă (funcție de repetare); Bănci de pad-uri (straturi multiple); Curbe de răspuns pentru pad; Sensibilitate reglabilă a pad-ului; Aftertouch polifonic; Pad-uri sensibile la presiune (fără aftertouch); Pad-uri iluminate (RGB); Funcții Roll/Flam; Mod scală; Secvențiator în pași; Bandă tactilă; Controale de transport; Pad-uri sensibile la viteză; Afișaj cu feedback vizual; Pad tactil X/Y; Altele
pl: Funkcje wykonawcze kontrolera padów: Przypisywalne pady; Aftertouch kanałowy; Tryb akordów; Tryb wyciszenia/solo; Powtarzanie nut/roll (funkcja powtarzania); Banki padów (wiele warstw); Krzywe reakcji padów; Regulowana czułość padów; Aftertouch polifoniczny; Pady czułe na nacisk (bez aftertouch); Pady RGB/podświetlane; Funkcje roll/flam; Tryb skali; Sekwencer krokowy; Pasek dotykowy; Elementy sterujące transportem; Pady dynamiczne; Wyświetlacz ze wskaźnikami wizualnymi; Panel dotykowy X/Y; Inne
el: Pad υπεύθυνος επεξεργασίας απόδοσης features: Εκχωρήσιμα pads; Channel aftertouch; Λειτουργία συγχορδίας; Λειτουργία σίγασης/σόλο; Note repeat/roll (λειτουργία επανάληψης); Τράπεζες pad (πολλαπλά επίπεδα); Καμπύλες απόκρισης pad; Ρυθμιζόμενη ευαισθησία pad; Polyphonic aftertouch; Pads ευαίσθητα στην πίεση (χωρίς aftertouch); RGB/φωτιζόμενα pads (με οπίσθιο φωτισμό); Λειτουργίες Roll/Flam; Λειτουργία κλίμακας; Step sequencer; Ταινία αφής (Touch strip); Στοιχεία ελέγχου μεταφοράς; Pad με ευαισθησία στην ταχύτητα; Οθόνη οπτικών ενδείξεων; Touch pad X/Y; Άλλο
es: Características de rendimiento del controlador tipo almohadilla: Pads asignables; Aftertouch de canal; Modo de acordes; Modo de silencio/solo; Repetición/redoble de notas (función de repetición); Bancos de pads (múltiples capas); Curvas de respuesta de los pads; Sensibilidad ajustable de los pads; Aftertouch polifónico; Pads sensibles a la presión (sin aftertouch); Pads RGB/retroiluminados (iluminados); Funciones de redoble/mordente; Modo de escala; Secuenciador de pasos; Banda táctil; Controles de transporte; Pads sensibles a la velocidad; Pantalla de retroalimentación visual; Panel táctil X/Y; Otro
nb: Ytelsesfunksjoner for putekontroller: Tilordnbare pads; Kanal-aftertouch; Akkordmodus; Demp-/solomodus; Note repetering/rull (repeteringsfunksjon); Pad-banker (flere lag); Responskurver for pad; Justerbar pad-følsomhet; Polyfonisk aftertouch; Trykkfølsomme pads (ingen aftertouch); RGB/bakgrunnsbelyste pads (opplyst); Roll-/flam-funksjoner; Skalamodus; Trinnsekvenserer; Berøringsstripe; Transportkontroller; Anslagsfølsomme pads; Skjerm for visuell tilbakemelding; X/Y-pekeplate; Annet
zh-CN: 打击垫控制器性能特性: 可分配打击垫; 通道触后; 和弦模式; 静音/独奏模式; 音符重复/滚奏（重复功能）; 打击垫库（多层）; 打击垫响应曲线; 打击垫灵敏度可调; 复音触后; 压感打击垫（无触后）; RGB/背光打击垫（发光）; 滚奏/装饰音功能; 音阶模式; 步进音序器; 触摸条; 走带控制; 力度感应打击垫; 视觉反馈显示屏; X/Y 触摸板; 其他
it: Caratteristiche prestazionali del controller del pad: Pad assegnabili; Aftertouch di canale; Modalità accordo; Modalità mute/solo; Note repeat/roll (funzione di ripetizione); Banchi pad (livelli multipli); Curve di risposta del pad; Sensibilità pad regolabile; Aftertouch polifonico; Pad sensibili alla pressione (senza aftertouch); Pad RGB/retroilluminati (illuminati); Funzioni roll/flam; Modalità scala; Step sequencer; Touch strip; Controlli di trasporto; Pad sensibili alla dinamica; Display di feedback visivo; Touch pad X/Y; Altro
ja: パッドコントローラーのパフォーマンス機能: アサイン可能なパッド; チャンネルアフタータッチ; コードモード; ミュート/ソロモード; ノートリピート/ロール (リピート機能); パッドバンク (複数レイヤー); パッドレスポンスカーブ; パッド感度調整可能; ポリフォニックアフタータッチ; 感圧式パッド (アフタータッチなし); RGB/バックライト付きパッド (イルミネーション機能); ロール/フラム機能; スケールモード; ステップシーケンサー; タッチストリップ; トランスポートコントロール; ベロシティ対応パッド; 視覚的フィードバックディスプレイ; X/Yタッチパッド; その他
tr: Pad kontrolcüsü performans özellikleri: Atanabilir pedler; Kanal aftertouch; Akor modu; Sessiz/solo mod; Nota tekrarı/yuvarlama (tekrar işlevi); Ped bankaları (çoklu katmanlar); Ped tepki eğrileri; Ped hassasiyeti ayarlanabilir; Polifonik aftertouch; Basınca duyarlı pedler (aftertouch yok); RGB/arkadan aydınlatmalı pedler (ışıklı); Roll/Flam işlevleri; Ölçek modu; Adımlı sıralayıcı; Dokunmatik şerit; Aktarım kontrolleri; Hıza duyarlı pedler; Görsel geri bildirim ekranı; X/Y dokunmatik ped; Diğer
lt-LT: Pad valdiklio atlikimo funkcijos: Priskiriami padai; Kanalo „aftertouch“; Akordų režimas; Nutildymo / solo režimas; Natos pakartojimas / „roll“ (pakartojimo funkcija); Padų bankai (keli sluoksniai); Padų atsako kreivės; Reguliuojamas padų jautrumas; Polifoninis „aftertouch“; Spaudimui jautrūs padai (be „aftertouch“); RGB / foninio apšvietimo padai (šviečiantys); „Roll“ / „Flam“ funkcijos; Gamos režimas; Žingsninis sekvenceris; Liečiamoji juosta; Transporto valdikliai; Greičiui jautrūs padai; Vaizdinio grįžtamojo ryšio ekranas; X/Y liečiamasis paviršius; Kita
sl-SI: Zmogljivostne lastnosti kontrolerja s ploščicami: Nastavljive blazinice; Kanalski aftertouch; Način za akorde; Način utišaj/solo; Ponavljanje note/zvijanje (funkcija ponavljanja); Banke blazinic (več plasti); Krivulje odziva blazinic; Nastavljiva občutljivost blazinic; Polifonični aftertouch; Blazinice, občutljive na pritisk (brez aftertoucha); Osvetljene blazinice (RGB/osvetlitev ozadja); Funkcije roll/flam; Način lestvice; Koračni sekvencer; Trak na dotik; Kontrolniki za predvajanje; Blazinice, občutljive na hitrost udarca; Zaslon z vizualnimi povratnimi informacijami; Plošča na dotik X/Y; Drugo
pt-BR: Controlador de pads recursos de performance: Pads endereçáveis; Aftertouch de canal; Modo de acordes; Modo mute/solo; Note repeat/roll (função de repetição); Bancos de pads (múltiplas camadas); Curvas de resposta dos pads; Sensibilidade ajustável dos pads; Aftertouch polifônico; Pads sensíveis à pressão (sem aftertouch); Pads RGB/retroiluminados (iluminados); Funções roll/flam; Modo de escala; Step sequencer; Touch strip; Controles de transporte; Pads sensíveis à velocidade; Exibição de feedback visual; Touch pad X/Y; Outros
da: Pad controllers performance-funktioner: Tildelbare pads; Channel aftertouch; Akkordtilstand; Mute/solo-tilstand; Note-repeat/roll (gentagefunktion); Pad-banker (flere lag); Pad-responskurver; Justerbar pad-følsomhed; Polyfonisk aftertouch; Trykfølsomme pads (ingen aftertouch); RGB/bagbelyste pads (oplyste); Roll/Flam-funktioner; Skalatilstand; Step-sequencer; Touch strip; Transportkontroller; Anslagsfølsomme pads; Visuelt feedback-display; X/Y-touchpad; Andet
sk-SK: Funkcie ovládača s ovládacími plochami: Priraditeľné pady; Kanálový aftertouch; Režim akordov; Režim stlmenia/sóla; Opakovanie nôt/vírenie (funkcia opakovania); Banky padov (viacero vrstiev); Krivky odozvy padov; Nastaviteľná citlivosť padov; Polyfonický aftertouch; Pady citlivé na tlak (bez aftertouch); RGB/podsvietené pady (osvetlené); Funkcie vírenie/flam; Režim stupníc; Krokový sekvencer; Dotykový pás (touch strip); Ovládače transportu; Pady citlivé na dynamiku; Displej s vizuálnou spätnou väzbou; X/Y dotykový pad; Iné
hr-HR: Značajke učinkovitosti kontrolera jastučića: Padovi kojima se može dodijeliti funkcija; Channel aftertouch; Način rada akorda; Način rada utišano/solo; Note repeat/roll (funkcija ponavljanja); Banke padova (višestruki slojevi); Krivulje odziva pada; Podesiva osjetljivost pada; Polifoni aftertouch; Padovi osjetljivi na pritisak (bez aftertoucha); RGB / padovi s pozadinskim osvjetljenjem (osvijetljeni); Funkcije Roll/Flam; Način rada ljestvice; Step sekvencer; Dodirna traka; Kontrole prijenosa; Padovi osjetljivi na brzinu; Zaslon za vizualne povratne informacije; X/Y dodirni pad; Ostalo
zh-TW: 打擊墊控制器演奏功能: 可分配打擊板; 通道觸後; 和弦模式; 靜音/獨奏模式; 音符重複/滾奏 (重複功能); 打擊板庫 (多層); 打擊板力度反應曲線; 打擊板靈敏度可調; 複音觸後; 壓力感應打擊板 (無觸後); RGB/背光打擊板 (會發光); 滾奏/裝飾音功能; 音階模式; 步進編曲機; 觸控條; 傳輸控制; 力度感應打擊板; 視覺回饋顯示器; X/Y 觸控板; 其他
nl: Padcontroller prestatiekenmerken: Toewijsbare pads; Kanaal-aftertouch; Akkoordmodus; Mute-/solomodus; Note-repeat/roll (herhaalfunctie); Padbanken (meerdere lagen); Pad-responscurves; Padsensitiviteit instelbaar; Polyfone aftertouch; Drukgevoelige pads (geen aftertouch); RGB/verlichte pads (geïllumineerd); Roll-/flam-functies; Toonladdermodus; Step-sequencer; Touchstrip; Transportknoppen; Aanslaggevoelige pads; Display voor visuele feedback; X/Y-touchpad; Overige
hu: Padvezérlő előadói funkciói: Hozzárendelhető padek; Csatorna aftertouch; Akkord mód; Némítás/szóló mód; Hangismétlés/pergés (ismétlő funkció); Pad-bankok (több réteg); Pad-válaszgörbék; Állítható pad-érzékenység; Polifonikus aftertouch; Nyomásérzékeny padek (nincs aftertouch); RGB/háttérvilágításos padek (megvilágított); Pergetés/előke funkciók; Skála mód; Step szekvencer; Érintősáv; Lejátszásvezérlők; Dinamikaérzékeny padok; Vizuális visszajelző kijelző; X/Y érintőpad; Egyéb
de: Performance-Funktionen des Pad-Controllers: Zuweisbare Pads; Kanal-Aftertouch; Akkord-Modus; Mute/Solo-Modus; Noten-Repeat/Roll (Wiederholungsfunktion); Pad-Bänke (mehrere Ebenen); Pad-Anschlagskurven; Pad-Empfindlichkeit einstellbar; Polyphoner Aftertouch; Druckempfindliche Pads (kein Aftertouch); RGB/Pads mit Hintergrundbeleuchtung (beleuchtet); Roll/Flam-Funktionen; Skalen-Modus; Step-Sequencer; Touch-Strip; Transportsteuerungen; Anschlagdynamische Pads; Visuelles Feedback-Display; X/Y-Touchpad; Sonstige
pt-PT: Características de desempenho do controlador de pad: Pads atribuíveis; Aftertouch de canal; Modo de acordes; Modo de silenciar/solo; Repetição de notas/rolamento (função de repetição); Bancos de pads (múltiplas camadas); Curvas de resposta dos pads; Sensibilidade dos pads ajustável; Aftertouch polifónico; Pads sensíveis à pressão (sem aftertouch); Pads RGB/retroiluminados (iluminados); Funções de rolamento/flam; Modo de escala; Sequenciador de passos; Faixa tátil; Controlos de transporte; Pads sensíveis à velocidade; Ecrã de feedback visual; Painel tátil X/Y; Outro
fi: Pad-ohjaimen tehokkaat ominaisuudet: Määritettävät padit; Kanavakohtainen aftertouch; Sointutila; Mykistys-/solotila; Nuotin toisto/roll (toistotoiminto); Pad-pankit (useita tasoja); Padien vastekäyrät; Säädettävä padien herkkyys; Moniääninen aftertouch; Paineen tunnistavat padit (ei aftertouchia); RGB/taustavalaistut padit (valaistut); Roll/Flam-toiminnot; Asteikkotila; Askel-sekvensseri; Kosketusnauha; Siirtopainikkeet; Lyöntivoimakkuuden tunnistavat padit; Visuaalinen palautenäyttö; X/Y-kosketuslevy; Muu